Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Chapter 9 Circuit Courts

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, ch. 150, § 1, also enacted a Title 5, chapter 9 (§§

5-9-101

through

5-9-107

), which has been redesignated as chapter 10 (§§

5-10-101

through

5-10-107

) in light of the enactment of chapter 9 by
Laws 2000, ch.24, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

20 Am. Jur. 2d Courts §§ 12, 16, 17.

Malicious prosecution: defense of acting on advice of justice of the peace, magistrate or lay person, 48 ALR4th 250.

21 C.J.S. Courts §§ 105, 121.